Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4225.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [16B.992] PROHIBITION ON USE OF STATE FUNDS; PROTESTS. new text end new text begin No state funds or money granted by the state may in any way be used to pay for, reimburse, or otherwise facilitate protesting or demonstrating for or against a political cause or issue. new text end